Missouri, session 2026, HB1977.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 632.305, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 632.305, to read as follows:
632.305. 1. An application for detention for evaluation and treatment at a mental
health facility may be executed by any adult person, who need not be an attorney or
represented by an attorney, on a form provided by the court for such purpose, and shall allege
under oath[, without a notarization requirement,] that the applicant has reason to believe that
the respondent is suffering from a mental disorder and presents a likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or to others. The application shall specify the factual information on which
such belief is based and should contain the names and addresses of all persons known to the
applicant who have knowledge of such facts through personal observation.
2. The filing of a written application in court by any adult person, who need not be an
attorney or represented by an attorney, shall authorize the applicant to bring the matter before
the court on an ex parte basis to determine whether the respondent should be taken into
custody and transported to a mental health facility. The application may be filed in the court
having probate jurisdiction in any county where the respondent may be found. If the court
finds that there is probable cause, either upon testimony under oath or upon a review of
affidavits, declarations, or other supporting documentation, to believe that the respondent
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1977 2
may be suffering from a mental disorder and presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself
or herself or others, it shall direct a peace officer to take the respondent into custody and
transport him or her to a mental health facility for detention for evaluation and treatment for a
period not to exceed ninety-six hours unless further detention and treatment is authorized
pursuant to this chapter. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the court, in the
exercise of its discretion, from giving the respondent an opportunity to be heard.
3. A peace officer may take a person into custody for detention for evaluation and
treatment at a mental health facility for a period not to exceed ninety-six hours only when
such peace officer has reasonable cause to believe that such person is suffering from a mental
disorder and that the likelihood of serious harm by such person to himself or herself or others
is imminent unless such person is immediately taken into custody. Upon arrival at the mental
health facility, the peace officer who conveyed such person or caused him or her to be
conveyed shall either present the application for detention for evaluation and treatment upon
which the court has issued a finding of probable cause and the respondent was taken into
custody or complete an application for initial detention for evaluation and treatment for a
period not to exceed ninety-six hours which shall be based upon his or her own personal
observations or investigations and shall contain the information required in subsection 1 of
this section.
4. If a person presents himself or herself or is presented by others to a mental health
facility and a licensed physician, a registered professional nurse or a mental health
professional designated by the head of the facility and approved by the department for such
purpose has reasonable cause to believe that the person is mentally disordered and presents an
imminent likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself or others unless he or she is
accepted for detention, the licensed physician, the mental health professional or the registered
professional nurse designated by the facility and approved by the department may complete
an application for detention for evaluation and treatment for a period not to exceed ninety-six
hours. The application shall be based on his or her own personal observations or
investigation and shall contain the information required in subsection 1 of this section.
5. (1) No notarization shall be required for an application, or for any affidavits,
declarations, or other documents supporting an application, completed or executed by:
(a) A peace officer under subsection 3 of this section;
(b) A licensed physician, mental health professional, or registered professional
nurse under subsection 4 of this section; or
(c) An employee acting on behalf of a hospital, as defined in section 197.020,
under subsections 1 and 2 of this section.

HB 1977 3
(2) The application and any affidavits, declarations, or other documents supporting
the application shall be subject to the provisions of section 492.060 allowing for declaration
under penalty of perjury.
✔